vec.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -àr inregolari ((re)andar)
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2g0E0E1E2
SFX g0 Y 37
SFX g0 andar vàtu/M0 andar	is:interrogative
SFX g0 andar vede/N0 andar
SFX g0 andar vege/N0 andar
SFX g0 andar vemo/E0E1E2J0 andar
SFX g0 andar ven/J0 andar
SFX g0 andar vene andar
SFX g0 andar vétu/M0 andar	is:interrogative
SFX g0 andar véu/O0 andar
SFX g0 andar vion/E0E1E2J0 andar
SFX g0 andar vione/K0 andar	is:interrogative
SFX g0 andar vionme/G0G1 andar
SFX g0 andar viónmene/G0G1G2 andar
SFX g0 andar von/E0E1E2J0 andar
SFX g0 andar vone/K0 andar	is:interrogative
SFX g0 andar vonme/G0G1 andar
SFX g0 andar và/E0E1E2 andar
SFX g0 andar vàme/G0G1G2 andar
SFX g0 andar vàmene/G0G1G2 andar
SFX g0 andar vè/F0F1F2J0N0 andar
SFX g0 andar vème/G0G1G2 andar
SFX g0 andar vèmene/G0G1G2 andar
SFX g0 andar vètu/M0 andar	is:interrogative
SFX g0 andar vèu/O0 andar
SFX g0 andar vé/F0F1F2N0 andar
SFX g0 andar vónmene/G0G1G2 andar
SFX g0 o a vào
SFX g0 o e/F0F1F2J0 vào
SFX g0 o gone/K0 vào	is:interrogative
SFX g0 o i vào
SFX g0 r gando/E0E1E2 andar
SFX g0 r gàndome/G0G1G2 andar
SFX g0 r gàndomene/G0G1G2 andar
SFX g0 r gàntome/G0G1G2 andar
SFX g0 r gàntomene/G0G1G2 andar
SFX g0 ào aga vào
SFX g0 ào agi/F0F1F2L0 vào
SFX g0 ào ago/J0T0 vào

# vèrbi -ér inregolari ((re)(g)aver)
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2h0E0E1E2
SFX h0 Y 195
SFX h0 0 me/G0G1 aver
SFX h0 0 ne/K0 o	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver ebi/F0F1F2L0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebia/E0E1E2 aver
SFX h0 aver ebie/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebiede/N0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebiege/N0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebiemo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebien/J0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebiene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver ebion/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebione/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver ebionme/G0G1 aver
SFX h0 aver ebiè/J0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebiène/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver ebié/N0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebiémoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebiéu/O0 aver
SFX h0 aver ebiónmene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver élo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver ene/K0 aver	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver epi/F0F1F2L0 aver
SFX h0 aver epia/E0E1E2 aver
SFX h0 aver epie/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 aver epiede/N0 aver
SFX h0 aver epiege/N0 aver
SFX h0 aver epiemo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 aver epien/J0 aver
SFX h0 aver epiene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver epion/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 aver epione/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver epionme/G0G1 aver
SFX h0 aver epiè/J0 aver
SFX h0 aver epiène/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver epié/N0 aver
SFX h0 aver epiémoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 aver epiéu/O0 aver
SFX h0 aver epiónmene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver ese/I0T0 aver
SFX h0 aver eva/F0F1F2J0N0 aver
SFX h0 aver eve/J0 aver
SFX h0 aver evi/J0L0N0 aver
SFX h0 aver evo/J0 aver
SFX h0 aver éƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver à/E0E1E2J0L0 aver
SFX h0 aver àbielo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver àbiene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver àbieƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver àbime/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver àbimene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver àbionme/G0G1 aver
SFX h0 aver àbitu/M0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver àe/F0F1F2J0 aver	ts:conditional_present
SFX h0 aver àene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver àlo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver àme/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver àmene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver àne/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver àpielo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver àpiene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver àpieƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver àpime/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver àpimene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver àpionme/G0G1 aver
SFX h0 aver àpitu/M0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver àƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver èbielo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver èbiene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver èbieƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver èpielo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver èpiene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver èpieƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver éane/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver éau/O0 aver
SFX h0 aver ébiene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver ébime/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver ébimene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver ébitu/M0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver éelo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver éene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver éeƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver éimo/J0 aver
SFX h0 aver éimoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 aver éitu/M0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver emo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 aver émoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 aver émome/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver émomene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver éone/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver épiene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver épime/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver épimene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver épitu/M0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver érmene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 aver ésimo aver
SFX h0 aver éu/O0 aver
SFX h0 aver évane/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver évau/O0 aver
SFX h0 aver évelo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver évene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver éveƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 aver évimo/J0 aver
SFX h0 aver évimoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 aver évitu/M0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver évone/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 aver í/F0F1F2N0 aver
SFX h0 aver ímoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 aver ò/J0 aver
SFX h0 aver òe/K0 aver
SFX h0 er e/K0 aver
SFX h0 er éelo/B0 aver
SFX h0 er éeƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 er ésimo aver
SFX h0 er évane/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 er évau/O0 aver
SFX h0 o e/E0E1E2J0 o
SFX h0 r me/G0G1 aver
SFX h0 r mo/E0E1E2 aver
SFX h0 r n/J0 aver
SFX h0 r va/F0F1F2 aver
SFX h0 ver bi/F0F1F2L0 aver
SFX h0 ver bia/E0E1E2 aver
SFX h0 ver biando/E0E1E2 ver
SFX h0 ver bianto/E0E1E2 ver
SFX h0 ver bie/F0F1F2J0 aver
SFX h0 ver biede/N0 aver
SFX h0 ver biege/N0 aver
SFX h0 ver biemo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 ver bien/J0 aver
SFX h0 ver biene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver bion/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 ver bione/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver biàndome/G0G1G2 ver
SFX h0 ver biàndomene/G0G1G2 ver
SFX h0 ver biè/J0 aver
SFX h0 ver biène/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver bié/N0 aver
SFX h0 ver biémoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 ver biéu/O0 aver
SFX h0 ver budo/B0 aver
SFX h0 ver bú/B0 aver
SFX h0 ver pi/F0F1F2L0 aver
SFX h0 ver pia/E0E1E2 aver
SFX h0 ver pie/F0F1F2J0 aver
SFX h0 ver piede/N0 aver
SFX h0 ver piege/N0 aver
SFX h0 ver piemo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 ver pien/J0 aver
SFX h0 ver piene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver pion/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 ver pione/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver piè/J0 aver
SFX h0 ver piène/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver pié/N0 aver
SFX h0 ver piémoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 ver piéu/O0 aver
SFX h0 ver ràlo/B0 aver
SFX h0 ver ràne/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver ràtu/M0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver rave/F0F1F2Q1Q2 aver	ts:conditional_present
SFX h0 ver raƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 ver remo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX h0 ver resi/N0 aver
SFX h0 ver resiu/O0 aver
SFX h0 ver rimo/J0 aver
SFX h0 ver risi/N0 aver
SFX h0 ver risiu/O0 aver
SFX h0 ver rà/F0F1F2J0L0 aver
SFX h0 ver ràe/F0F1F2 aver	ts:conditional_present
SFX h0 ver ràvelo/B0 aver
SFX h0 ver ràvene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver ràveƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 ver rè/J0 aver
SFX h0 ver rène/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver ré/N0 aver
SFX h0 ver rémoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 ver rémome/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 ver rémomene/G0G1G2 aver
SFX h0 ver résimo/J0 aver
SFX h0 ver résimoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 ver réu/O0 aver
SFX h0 ver rí/N0 aver
SFX h0 ver ría/F0F1F2J0L0 aver
SFX h0 ver rèe/F0F1F2J0L0 aver
SFX h0 ver ríane/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver ríatu/M0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver ríelo/B0 aver
SFX h0 ver ríene/K0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver ríeƚo/B0 aver
SFX h0 ver rímoe/K0 aver
SFX h0 ver rísitu/M0 aver	is:interrogative
SFX h0 ver ríu/O0 aver
SFX h0 ver rò/J0 aver
SFX h0 ver ròe/K0 aver
SFX h0 ver tu/M0 aver	is:interrogative
